Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 5. Preferences, Disposition of Assets, Reorganization

§ 13-4-501.
Expenses of liquidation first priority.

The expenses incurred by the state banking commissioner in the liquidation of a bank include the expenses of examiners employed in the liquidation and reasonable attorney fees incurred in the course of the liquidation. Compensation for these services shall be fixed by the state banking commissioner. The expenses shall be paid out of the property of the bank and shall be paid first in the order of priority.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 93; 1927, ch. 100, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 10-514; C.S. 1945, § 35-523; W.S. 1957, § 13-149; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Receiver's (now commissioner's) compensation and necessary expenses including attorney's fees

are chargeable against property in his hands as costs incurred in administration of the trust. Kilpatrick v. Horton, 15 Wyo. 501, 89 P. 1035,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1907).

Evidence being conflicting as to whether receiver (now commissioner), who was stockholder of concern placed in his charge, had agreed to give his services as receiver without compensation, finding of trial court that he was entitled to compensation will not be disturbed. Riordan v. Horton, 16 Wyo. 363, 94 P. 448,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1908).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amount of compensation for attorney services in absence of contract or statute fixing amount, 57 ALR3d 475.

§ 13-4-502.
Preference to negotiable instruments.

Negotiable instruments issued by a bank as drawee in payment of checks or drafts deposited in any other bank for collection are entitled to preferred payment upon the insolvency of the issuing bank.

Negotiable instruments issued by any collecting bank in exchange for checks or drafts deposited with or forwarded to the bank for payment by the bank on which the negotiable instruments are drawn are entitled to preferred payment upon the insolvency of the collecting bank.

Negotiable instruments issued by a collecting bank in exchange for notes and other evidences of indebtedness deposited with or forwarded to the bank for collection are entitled to preferred payment upon the insolvency of the bank.

The provisions of this section do not affect other claims entitled by law to preference against insolvent banks.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 141, §§ 1 to 4; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-530 to 10-533; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-519 to 35-522; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-145 to 13-148; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Worthless securities. —

When statute refers to preferred claims it necessarily postulates existence of valid claims, and if securities deposited for collection are worthless, no claim can arise in favor of a depositor even as general creditor. In re Riverton State Bank, 47 Wyo. 469, 38 P.2d 603,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1934), modified, 48 Wyo. 372, 49 P.2d 637,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 13-4-503.
Rights of secured creditors, depositors or creditors.

The rights of secured creditors in the security pledged or in the capital stock assessment are not affected nor are the rights of depositors or creditors affected on bonds or other contracts with third parties by W.S.

13-4-505

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 129, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 10-537; C.S. 1945, § 35-547; W.S. 1957, § 13-174; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to secured transactions, see article 9 of title 34.1.

§ 13-4-504.
Reorganization.

Any bank reorganization requiring the consent of depositors, stockholders and other creditors becomes effective only:

When the state banking commissioner is satisfied that the plan of reorganization is fair and equitable to all depositors, stockholders and other creditors and is in the public interest; and

When, after reasonable notice of the reorganization, the following have given their consent in writing to the reorganization:

Depositors and other creditors of the bank representing at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its total deposits and other liabilities; and

Stockholders owning at least two-thirds (2/3) of its outstanding capital stock.

The claims of depositors or other creditors which will be satisfied in full under the provisions of the plan of reorganization shall not be included among the total deposits and other liabilities of the bank in determining the consent requirements.

When a reorganization becomes effective, all books, records and assets of the bank shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the plan and the affairs of the bank shall be conducted by its board of directors in the manner provided by the state banking commissioner and the plan.

All depositors, creditors and stockholders of the bank, whether or not they have consented, shall be fully bound by the provisions of an approved plan of reorganization. Claims of depositors and other creditors shall be treated as if the depositors, creditors and stockholders had consented to the plan of reorganization.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 35-706; W.S. 1957, § 13-181; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-505.
Hearing to be set; order for distribution of assets.

Prior to ordering any distribution of the assets of a bank, the district court shall set a hearing, with notice to all creditors and stockholders as the court may direct.

The district court upon application of the state banking commissioner may order the distribution of the assets of any bank which have come into the hands of the state banking commissioner for liquidation. The disposition shall be in conformity to any agreement of reorganization or sale of assets agreed to by the holders of seventy-five percent (75%) of the unsecured direct obligations of the bank. The court may make any modifications necessary to insure the equitable distribution of the assets of the bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-534, 10-535; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-544, 35-545; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-171, 13-172; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-506.
Dividends; borrowing to pay dividends; court approval needed.

After the expiration of the time for the presentation of claims, the state banking commissioner may declare dividends out of any remaining funds after payment of expenses. One (1) year from the first publication of notice to creditors he may declare a final dividend as directed by the district court.

The state banking commissioner when he deems the payment of dividends without further delay to be advisable may borrow money from any governmental agency. As security for the loan, the state banking commissioner may pledge assets of the insolvent bank as necessary.

The authority of this section shall be exercised only with the approval of the district court of the county in which the bank is located. The court shall determine the amount that may be borrowed, the rate of interest that may be paid, the maturity of the proposed loan and the assets that may be pledged as collateral.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 96; R.S. 1931, § 10-517; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 6, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-526 to 35-528; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-152 to 13-154; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.